Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1897.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:(1) No act or omission in the provision of core aspects of a community-based public safety program:(a) That is provided to a person who is experiencing a behavioral health crisis, has complex behavioral health needs, or has a history of legal system involvement; and(b) Which is done or omitted in good faith, shall impose liability upon any community-based public safety program or any volunteer, agent, officer, or employee of such program acting within the scope of their responsibilities.(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Community-based public safety program" means any organization providing community-based responses to public order issues as an alternative to jail and criminal prosecution for people whose unlawful behavior stems from unmanaged substance use, mental health challenges, or extreme poverty. "Community-based public safety program" includes any organization performing a contracted role for a locally funded, state-funded, or federally funded community-based public safety program.(b) "Core aspects of a community-based public safety program" means activities directly connected to the purpose of a community-based public safety program, including but not limited to outreach, case management, providing shelter, providing housing, traveling among worksites, transporting clients, and aftercare functions.(3) This section does not apply to any act or omission which constitutes either gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.--- END ---